Hawaii, session 2026, SB3078.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF HAWAII: SECTION 1.  The legislature finds that the State's mental health laws provide a variety of methods to intervene and support individuals suffering from mental illness or substance abuse. In 2025, the legislature passed Senate Bill No. 1322, enacted as Act 219, Session Laws of Hawaii 2025, substantially clarifying the procedures relating to the emergency transportation, examination, and hospitalization of individuals who may be mentally ill or suffering from substance abuse and who are imminently dangerous to self or others.  These clarifications included guidance on the roles and responsibilities of crisis intervention officers during emergency transportation.  Act 219 also clarified the laws governing assisted community treatment and the administration of treatment over the objection of patients who have been involuntarily committed to a psychiatric facility or who are in the custody of the director of health and residing in a psychiatric facility. The purpose of this Act is to make additional clarifications to the laws concerning mental health intervention by: (1)  Requiring the director of law enforcement to adopt rules establishing training and certification standards and procedures for crisis intervention officers; (2)  Clarifying the scope of treatment allowable under orders for assisted community treatment; and (3)  Requiring the department of the attorney general to assist with the preparation, filing, and presentation of any request for a court or administrative order authorizing treatment over the objection of certain patients. SECTION 2.  Chapter 353C, Hawaii Revised Statutes, is amended by adding a new section to be appropriately designated and to read as follows: "§353C-     Training and certification standards and procedures regarding crisis intervention officers.  Without regard to chapter 91, the director shall adopt rules setting forth statewide training and certification standards and procedures for a crisis intervention officer." SECTION 3.  Section 334-122, Hawaii Revised Statutes, is amended by amending the definition of "assisted community treatment" to read as follows: ""Assisted community treatment" [includes medication specifically authorized by court order; individual] means the categories of treatment and services ordered by the court in a treatment plan pursuant to section 334-127(b).  "Assisted community treatment" includes a case management plan and case management services to provide care coordination under the supervision of an assisted community treatment provider.  The categories of treatment and services may include: (1)  Medication; (2)  Periodic blood tests or urinalysis to monitor compliance with prescribed medication; (3)  Individual or group therapy; [day] (4)  Day or partial day programming activities; [services] (5)  Services and training, including educational and vocational activities; [supervision] (6)  Supervision of living arrangements; (7)  Residential services; (8)  Alcohol and substance abuse treatment and counseling; (9)  Periodic blood tests or urinalysis for the presence of alcohol or illegal drugs for individuals with a history of alcohol or substance abuse; and [any] (10)  Any other services prescribed to either alleviate the subject of the order's disorder or disability, maintain or maximize semi-independent functioning, or prevent further deterioration that may reasonably be predicted to result in the need for hospitalization or more intensive or restrictive levels of care in the community or incarceration for criminal behavior." SECTION 4.  Section 334-161, Hawaii Revised Statutes, is amended by amending subsection (b) to read as follows: "(b) [For the purposes of this section, "imminently dangerous to self or others" means that, without intervention, the person will likely become dangerous to self or dangerous to others within the next forty-five days.]  The department of the attorney general shall assist with the preparation and filing of any request for authorization to provide treatment over a patient's objection, whether submitted through an administrative process or to a court, and shall assist with the presentation of the case at any related court proceedings; provided that, if the requestor is a private provider or other private individual, the requestor may decline the assistance." SECTION 5.  Section 353C-1, Hawaii Revised Statutes, is amended by amending the definition of "crisis intervention officer" to read as follows: ""Crisis intervention officer" means a law enforcement officer, as defined in section 139-1, who has been trained and certified to recognize and communicate with an individual who is in crisis or suffering from some form of impairment, whether from dementia, Alzheimer's disease, or any physical, developmental, cognitive, psychological, or substance use disorder influencing their behavior.  [Training and certification standards shall be determined with the department of health.]" SECTION 6.  This Act does not affect rights and duties that matured, penalties that were incurred, and proceedings that were begun before its effective date. SECTION 7.  Statutory material to be repealed is bracketed and stricken.  New statutory material is underscored. SECTION 8.  This Act shall take effect upon its approval. INTRODUCED BY: _____________________________ BY REQUEST